Florida, session 2026, SB760.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âVictim Safety in 25 Pretrial Release Act.â 26 Section 2.âSection 903.0472, Florida Statutes, is created 27 to read: 28 903.0472âViolations of pretrial release for specified 29 violent crimes.â 30 (1)âA person who willfully violates a condition of pretrial 31 release provided in s. 903.047 when the original arrest was for 32 any of the following offenses, which offense involved violence 33 or a credible threat of violence and the victim of which such 34 offense was an individual: 35 (a)âA forcible felony, as defined in s. 776.08; 36 (b)âMurder, as defined in s. 782.04; 37 (c)âManslaughter, as defined in s. 782.07; 38 (d)âAssault, as defined in s. 784.011; 39 (e)âAggravated assault, as defined in s. 784.021; 40 (f)âBattery, as defined in s. 784.03; 41 (g)âAggravated battery, as defined in s. 784.045; 42 (h)âStalking, as defined in s. 784.048(2); 43 (i)âAggravated stalking, as defined in s. 784.048(3), (4), 44 (5), or (7); 45 (j)âKidnapping, as defined in s. 787.01; 46 (k)âFalse imprisonment, as defined in s. 787.02; 47 (l)âSexual battery, as defined in s. 794.011; 48 (m)âLewd or lascivious offenses committed upon or in the 49 presence of persons less than 16 years of age, as described in 50 s. 800.04; 51 (n)âRobbery, as defined in s. 812.13; 52 (o)âWritten or electronic threats to kill or do bodily 53 injury, as described in s. 836.10; or 54 (p)âAny criminal offense resulting in physical injury or 55 death, 56 57 commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as 58 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 59 (2)âA person who commits a second or subsequent violation 60 of subsection (1) which is against the victim of the original 61 offense or which constitutes a new act of violence or threat of 62 violence commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as 63 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 64 (3)âA person who is arrested for a violation of this 65 section shall be held in custody until his or her first 66 appearance hearing, at which time the court shall review the 67 alleged violation and determine whether to order pretrial 68 detention or to grant pretrial release with appropriate 69 conditions. In making such determinations, the court shall 70 prioritize the safety of the victim and the public and shall 71 also consider: 72 (a)âThe nature and severity of the original offense. 73 (b)âThe personâs history of compliance with court orders. 74 (c)âAny evidence of intent to intimidate, harass, or harm 75 any person. 76 (4)âA law enforcement officer may not be held liable in any 77 civil action for an arrest of a person based on probable cause 78 to believe that the person has violated this section. 79 Section 3.âSubsection (13) of section 901.15, Florida 80 Statutes, is amended to read: 81 901.15âWhen arrest by officer without warrant is lawful.âA 82 law enforcement officer may arrest a person without a warrant 83 when: 84 (13)âThere is probable cause to believe that the person has 85 committed an act that violates a condition of pretrial release 86 provided in s. 903.047 when the original arrest was for an act 87 of domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28, or when the 88 original arrest was for an act of dating violence as defined in 89 s. 784.046, or a violent crime specified in s. 903.0472(1). 90 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.